Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-3403.01
ABET, defined.

ABET means an entity incorporated as the Accreditation Board for Engineering and Technology, Inc., which is a nongovernmental organization that accredits postsecondary education programs.

Laws 2020, LB755, § 36.